Nevada, session 83, SB193.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 319 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The Division shall, subject to the availability of funds
appropriated for such a purpose, establish a pilot program for an
eligible borrower who meets the qualifications set forth in
subsection 3 to buy down the interest rate of a fixed-rate mortgage
loan with an amortization period of 30 years for an owner-
occupied residence in this State for the eligible borrower that is
obtained from a lending institution approved by the Division in
accordance with any regulations adopted pursuant to subsection 5.
2. The pilot program established pursuant to subsection 1
must, without limitation:
(a) Include a process for an eligible borrower to apply to
participate in the program; and
(b) Provide for a buy down for the mortgage loan of the
eligible borrower.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, an eligible
borrower may receive assistance from the pilot program
established pursuant to subsection 1 if the eligible borrower:
(a) Is in the process of obtaining his or her first mortgage loan
from a lending institution approved by the Division for the
purchase of an owner-occupied residence.
(b) Qualifies as a first-time homebuyer. An eligible borrower
qualifies as a first-time homebuyer if:
(1) The eligible borrower and, except as otherwise provided
in subparagraphs (2) and (3), the spouse of the eligible borrower,
if applicable, have had no ownership interest in any residential
real property at any time during the 3-year period immediately
preceding the date on which a mortgage for the residence is or will
be executed;
(2) The eligible borrower is a single person who is a
displaced homemaker and, except for owning a home with his or
her spouse or residing in a home owned by his or her spouse,
meets the requirements of subparagraph (1); or
(3) The eligible borrower is a single person who is a single
parent and who, except for owning a home with his or her spouse
or residing in a home owned by his or her spouse while married,
meets the requirements of subparagraph (1).
-
*SB193_R1*

– 3 –
(c) Has a household income of not more than 160 percent of
the median income for the county in this State in which the
residence to be purchased is located.
(d) Meets any criteria for underwriting established by the
lending institution.
(e) Meets any other requirement prescribed by the Division by
regulation.
4. The Division may establish a process for an eligible
borrower who does not meet the household income requirement
set forth in paragraph (c) of subsection 3 to apply to the Division
for a waiver of that requirement.
5. The Division may adopt regulations to carry out the
provisions of this section, which may include, without limitation:
(a) The requirements for a lending institution to be approved
to participate in the program; and
(b) The procedures to apply for a waiver from the Division
pursuant to subsection 4.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Buy down” means the permanent decrease of the interest
rate of a fixed-rate mortgage loan with an amortization period of
30 years.
(b) “Displaced homemaker” has the meaning ascribed to it in
42 U.S.C. § 12854.
(c) “Single parent” has the meaning ascribed to it in 42 U.S.C.
§ 12854.
Sec. 2. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Housing Division of the Department of
Business and Industry the sum of $10,000,000 for establishing and
carrying out the pilot program to buy down interest rates on
mortgage loans for eligible borrowers required by section 1 of this
act.
2. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2027, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 3. 1. This section and section 2 of this act become
effective upon passage and approval.
2. Section 1 of this act becomes effective:
-
*SB193_R1*

– 4 –
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On January 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
H
-
*SB193_R1*